Hawaii statutes.
§425-125 Continuation of partnership beyond
definite term or particular undertaking. (a) If a partnership for a
definite term or particular undertaking is continued, without an express
agreement, after the expiration of the term or completion of the undertaking,
the rights and duties of the partners remain the same as they were at the
expiration or completion, so far as is consistent with a partnership at will.

(b) If the partners, or those of them who
habitually acted in the business during the term or undertaking, continue the
business without any settlement or liquidation of the partnership, they are
presumed to have agreed that the partnership will continue. [L 1999, c 284, pt
of §1]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next